Washington statutes.
RCW 38.14.006

Availability and composition of state guard.

The Washington state guard will be available to serve, at the call of the governor in the place of the national guard of the state of Washington under the provisions of this title when the national guard is in the service of the United States, or when otherwise ordered to active state service by the governor. The Washington state guard shall consist of commissioned and warrant officers and enlisted persons commissioned, warranted, or enlisted under the provisions of this title. Persons enlisted under RCW 38.16.015 shall be enrolled in accordance with regulations promulgated by the adjutant general.

[ 1989 c 19 s 23.]